Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Assent to Federal Law

43-14-101. Assent of general assembly to federal act — Policy of state — Duties of trustees of university.

The assent of the general assembly is given to the provisions and requirements of the “Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act” (Public Law No. 46, 74th Congress, approved April 27, 1935, as amended). The general assembly adopts as the policy of the state the policy of cooperating with the governments and agencies of other states and of the United States in carrying out the policy and purposes, specified in § 7(a) of that act of congress, and, in order to effectuate this policy, the trustees of the University of Tennessee are authorized and empowered to:

Formulate, with the assistance of the extension service and the agricultural experiment station, pursuant to the standards therefor set forth in § 7(a) of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, agricultural plans for this state for each calendar year, and from time to time, make such revisions in these plans as may be necessary to effectuate those purposes;

Prescribe such rules and regulations with reference to the administration of the plans, including provision for participation in the administration of the plans by county and community committees, or associations of agricultural producers, organized for such purpose, as may be necessary or expedient for the effective administration of the plans;

Provide in the plans for their administration by the trustees of the University of Tennessee, who are designated and authorized as the state agency of the state to administer the plans;

Submit the state plans to the secretary of agriculture of the United States, prior to such time and in such manner and form as the secretary may prescribe;

Receive on behalf of the state of Tennessee any grants made pursuant to § 7 of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, and to utilize and expend the grants in accordance with such state agricultural plans as may have been approved by the secretary of agriculture;

Utilize the available services and assistance of other state agencies of this state, including the agricultural experiment station and the extension service of the University of Tennessee, and exercise such powers and authorities, as may be necessary or proper to the performance of their duties and functions under this section;

Provide for the submission to the secretary of agriculture of such reports as may be required to ascertain whether the plans are being carried out according to their terms and assure the correctness, and make possible verification, of the reports; and

Submit to the governor an annual report for each year covering the administration and operation of the program.

Acts 1937, ch. 44, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.1 (Williams, § 552.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1401; Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 16 U.S.C. §§ 590a — 590q-3.

Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the provisions of the act.

Cross-References. Agricultural District and Farmland Preservation Act, title 43, ch. 34.

Chickasaw Basin authority cooperation with county soil conservation districts and conservation boards, § 64-1-210.

County appropriations for soil conservation purposes, § 5-9-106.

Flood control authorities, title 64, chapter 3.

Soil conservation payments due deceased person, to whom made, § 31-1-107.

Watershed areas, title 69, ch. 6.

West Tennessee river basin authority cooperation with county soil conservation districts, § 64-1-1107.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Comparative Legislation. Soil conservation districts:

Ala. Code § 9-8-20 et seq.

Ark. Code § 14-125-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-6-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 262.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-27-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 278.060 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 139-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 10.1-5 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
2.